Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Chapter 9

Refrigerated Locker Plants [Repealed]

53-9-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.1 (Williams, § 6617.13); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1101;

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, §§ 3, 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.2 (Williams, §§ 6617.14, 6617.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1102; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 13; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.12 (Williams, § 6617.25); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1103; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.3 (Williams, § 6617.15); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1104; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.13 (Williams, § 6617.26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1105; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.4 (Williams, § 6617.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1106; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.11 (Williams, § 6617.24); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1107; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.5 (Williams, § 6617.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1108; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.6 (Williams, § 6617.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1109; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.14 (Williams, § 6617.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1110; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-111. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.7 (Williams, § 6617.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1111; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-112. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.10 (Williams, § 6617.22); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1112; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-113. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.8 (Williams, § 6617.20); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1113; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-114. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.9 (Williams, § 6617.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1114; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-115. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.5 (Williams, § 6617.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1115; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.

53-9-116. [Repealed.]

Acts 1947, ch. 143, § 11-A; C. Supp. 1950, § 6617.15 (Williams, § 6617.23); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1116; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 6, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 53-9-101 — 53-9-116, concerned refrigerated locker plants.